Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2009
Survey and planning; application for federal funds; expenditure.

The department is authorized to make application to the Surgeon General for federal funds to assist in carrying out the activities provided in the State Hospital Survey and Construction Act. Such funds shall be deposited in the state treasury and shall be available when appropriated for expenditure for carrying out the purposes of the act. Any such funds received and not expended for such purposes shall be repaid to the Treasury of the United States.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 9, p. 736;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 7, p. 1352;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 512.